District of Columbia statutes.
34-1244.01

Repealed

Landlord-tenant relationship.

Repealed.

Aug. 21, 1982, D.C. Law 4-142, § 45a
as added Oct. 22, 1983, D.C. Law 5-36, § 2(pp), 30 DCR 4289
Oct. 9, 2002, D.C. Law 14-193, § 3, 49 DCR 7334
1981 Ed., § 43-1844.1.
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 3 of Cable Television Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-409, July 15, 2002, 49 DCR 7280).
Short title: The first section of D.C. Law 5-36 provided: “That this act may be cited as the ‘Cable Television Communications Act of 1981 Clarification Amendment Act of 1983’.”